searchsrv/searchengine/oss/sb/snowball/algorithms/finnish/stem_ISO_8859_1.sbl
/*

Copyright (c) 2001, Dr Martin Porter
Copyright (c) 2002, Richard Boulton
All rights reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with 
or without modification, are permitted provided that the 
following conditions are met:

*	Redistributions of source code must retain the 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and 
	the following disclaimer. 
*	Redistributions in binary form must reproduce 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and
 	the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or 
	other materials provided with the distribution. 
*	Neither the name of the <ORGANIZATION> nor the 
	names of its contributors may be used to endorse or 
	promote products derived from this software without
	specific rior written permission. 

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND 
CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, 
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF 
MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE 
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR 
CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, 
SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING, 
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR 
SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS 
INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, 
WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING 
NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE 
OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH 
DAMAGE.

*/
/* Finnish stemmer.

   Numbers in square brackets refer to the sections in
   Fred Karlsson, Finnish: An Essential Grammar. Routledge, 1999
   ISBN 0-415-20705-3

*/

routines (
           mark_regions
           R2
           particle_etc possessive
           LONG VI
           case_ending
           i_plural
           t_plural
           other_endings
           tidy
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 p2 )
strings ( x )
booleans ( ending_removed )
groupings ( AEI V1 V2 particle_end )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in ISO Latin I) */

stringdef a"   hex 'E4'
stringdef o"   hex 'F6'

define AEI 'a{a"}ei'
define V1 'aeiouy{a"}{o"}'
define V2 'aeiou{a"}{o"}'
define particle_end V1 + 'nt'

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit

    goto V1  gopast non-V1  setmark p1
    goto V1  gopast non-V1  setmark p2
)

backwardmode (

    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define particle_etc as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'kin'
            'kaan' 'k{a"}{a"}n'
            'ko'   'k{o"}'
            'han'  'h{a"}n'
            'pa'   'p{a"}'    // Particles [91]
                (particle_end)
            'sti'             // Adverb [87]
                (R2)
        )
        delete
    )
    define possessive as (    // [36]
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'si'
                (not 'k' delete)  // take 'ksi' as the Comitative case
            'ni'
                (delete ['kse'] <- 'ksi') // kseni = ksi + ni
            'nsa' 'ns{a"}'
            'mme'
            'nne'
                (delete)
            /* Now for Vn possessives after case endings: [36] */
            'an'
                (among('ta' 'ssa' 'sta' 'lla' 'lta' 'na') delete)
            '{a"}n'
                (among('t{a"}' 'ss{a"}' 'st{a"}'
                       'll{a"}' 'lt{a"}' 'n{a"}') delete)
            'en'
                (among('lle' 'ine') delete)
        )
    )

    define LONG as
        among('aa' 'ee' 'ii' 'oo' 'uu' '{a"}{a"}' '{o"}{o"}')

    define VI as ('i' V2)

    define case_ending as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'han'    ('a')          //-.
            'hen'    ('e')          // |
            'hin'    ('i')          // |
            'hon'    ('o')          // |
            'h{a"}n' ('{a"}')       // Illative   [43]
            'h{o"}n' ('{o"}')       // |
            'siin'   VI             // |
            'seen'   LONG           //-'

            'den'    VI
            'tten'   VI             // Genitive plurals [34]
                     ()
            'n'                     // Genitive or Illative
                ( try ( LONG // Illative
                        or 'ie' // Genitive
                          and next ]
                      )
                  /* otherwise Genitive */
                )

            'a' '{a"}'              //-.
                     (V1 non-V1)    // |
            'tta' 'tt{a"}'          // Partitive  [32]
                     ('e')          // |
            'ta' 't{a"}'            //-'

            'ssa' 'ss{a"}'          // Inessive   [41]
            'sta' 'st{a"}'          // Elative    [42]

            'lla' 'll{a"}'          // Adessive   [44]
            'lta' 'lt{a"}'          // Ablative   [51]
            'lle'                   // Allative   [46]
            'na' 'n{a"}'            // Essive     [49]
            'ksi'                   // Translative[50]
            'ine'                   // Comitative [51]

            /* Abessive and Instructive are too rare for
               inclusion [51] */

        )
        delete
        set ending_removed
    )
    define other_endings as (
        setlimit tomark p2 for ([substring])
        among(
            'mpi' 'mpa' 'mp{a"}'
            'mmi' 'mma' 'mm{a"}'    // Comparative forms [85]
                (not 'po')          //-improves things
            'impi' 'impa' 'imp{a"}'
            'immi' 'imma' 'imm{a"}' // Superlative forms [86]
            'eja' 'ej{a"}'          // indicates agent [93.1B]
        )
        delete
    )
    define i_plural as (            // [26]
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'i'  'j'
        )
        delete
    )
    define t_plural as (            // [26]
        setlimit tomark p1 for (
            ['t'] test V1
            delete
        )
        setlimit tomark p2 for ([substring])
        among(
            'mma' (not 'po') //-mmat endings
            'imma'           //-immat endings
        )
        delete
    )
    define tidy as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for (
            do ( LONG and ([next] delete ) ) // undouble vowel
            do ( [AEI] non-V1 delete ) // remove trailing a, a", e, i
            do ( ['j'] 'o' or 'u' delete )
            do ( ['o'] 'j' delete )
        )
        goto non-V1 [next] -> x  x delete // undouble consonant
    )
)

define stem as (

    do mark_regions
    unset ending_removed
    backwards (
        do particle_etc
        do possessive
        do case_ending
        do other_endings
        (ending_removed do i_plural) or do t_plural
        do tidy
    )
)
